Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.030

Action by complaint and notice.

Any person desiring to commence an action before a justice of the peace, by the service of a complaint and notice, can do so by filing his or her complaint verified by his or her own oath or that of his or her agent or attorney with the justice, and when such complaint is so filed, upon payment of his or her fees if demanded, the justice shall attach thereto a notice, which shall be substantially as follows:

The State of Washington,

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . County.











ss.

To . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

You are hereby notified to be and appear at my office in . . . . . . on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., at the hour of . . . . M., to answer to the foregoing complaint or judgment will be taken against you as confessed and the prayer of the plaintiff granted.

Dated . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., J. P.

[ 2016 c 202 s 11; 2010 c 8 s 3002; Code 1881 s 1714; 1873 p 336 s 21; 1860 p 245 s 29; RRS s 1759.]